Alaska statutes. Title 5. Amusements and Sports.
Article 1. Administration.

Sec. 05.15.010.
Department of Revenue to administer chapter.

The Department of Revenue shall administer this chapter.

History.

(§ 3 ch 27 SLA 1960; am E.O. No. 74 § 2 (1989); am E.O. No. 82 § 2 (1993))

Administrative Code. —

For suspension and revocation, see 15 AAC 160, art. 9.

Opinions of attorney general. —

AS

05.15.010

—
05.15.210 do not create any new categories of prohibited gambling activities.
1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 22.

Sec. 05.15.020.
Annual permit and fees.

A municipality or qualified organization may conduct an activity permitted under this chapter if the municipality or qualified organization

applies for a permit, pays the appropriate permit fee, and receives an annual permit issued by the department; and

designates a member in charge and at least one alternate member in charge under AS

05.15.112

who have passed the examination required by AS

05.15.112

.

An additional fee of one percent of the net proceeds received during the preceding year from the activities authorized under the permit shall be paid to the department annually by the municipality or qualified organization authorized to conduct activities under this chapter, if the gross receipts for the activities were $20,000 or more.

The annual permit fee under (a) of this section is

$20 for an applicant that did not hold a permit during the preceding year;

$20 for an applicant that had gross receipts of less than $20,000 from activities conducted under this chapter during the preceding year;

$50 for an applicant that had gross receipts of $20,000 or more but not exceeding $100,000 from activities conducted under this chapter during the preceding year; or

$100 for an applicant that had gross receipts exceeding $100,000 from activities conducted under this chapter during the preceding year.

History.

(§ 3 ch 27 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 182 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 99 SLA 1988; am §§ 1, 2 ch 70 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For permits and licenses, see 15 AAC 160, art. 1.

For multiple-beneficiary permits and self-directed permits, see 15 AAC 160, art. 4.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Although states do not have regulatory authority over conduct of Indians on reservations, a village council conducting bingo games off-reservation must comply with this section requiring a permit for such activities.
April 25, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 05.15.025.
Money deposited in general fund. [Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

Sec. 05.15.030.
Required notices by applicant, permittee, or licensee.

At the time of filing an application for a permit or license under this chapter, the applicant shall notify the city or borough nearest to the location of the proposed activity of the application. A local government unit may protest the conduct of the activity in its jurisdiction by resolution stating the reasons for the protest filed with the department; protests are limited to the lack of qualifications prescribed by this chapter. This resolution is only a recommendation by the local government that may be considered by the department in determining whether to issue or refuse to issue a permit or license.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 105 SLA 1995.]

If a permittee or licensee changes the location of an activity in the jurisdiction for which a permit has been issued, the permittee shall notify the department and the local government within 10 days after moving to the new location.

History.

(§ 3 ch 27 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 94 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 59 SLA 1983; am §§ 3, 4 ch 99 SLA 1988; am E.O. No. 82 § 3 (1993); am § 5 ch 105 SLA 1995)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1981. In 1988 the term “local government” was substituted for “city” in the last sentence of (a) of this section to correct an oversight in the 1962 codification.

Administrative Code. —

For permits and licenses, see 15 AAC 160, art. 1.

Sec. 05.15.040.
Issuance, effect, and term of permit.

After the fee is paid, a permit issued, and during the effective period of the permit, the municipality or qualified organization may conduct the activity specified in the permit.
A municipality that has been issued a permit under this chapter may not conduct any activity authorized by the permit outside of the geographic boundaries of the municipality.
If a permit is revoked, the permittee is not eligible for another permit until the expiration of one year from the date of revocation.
A permit expires at the end of the period for which it is issued.
A permit is not transferable.

History.

(§ 3 ch 27 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 27 SLA 1982)

Administrative Code. —

For permits and licenses, see 15 AAC 160, art. 1.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Under former AS 05.15.210 (now see AS

05.15.690

) a permit may be issued which gives a qualified organization the privilege of conducting any of the designated activities. AS

05.15.040

limits the activities that may be conducted to those activities specified in the permit. Under AS

05.15.060

the commissioner has authority to further limit the number of activities which may be conducted pursuant to any permit. Therefore, absent any regulation to the contrary, a permit could be issued for more than one activity to a qualified organization. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

Sec. 05.15.050.
Surrender of permit upon suspension or revocation.

When a permit is suspended or revoked, the permittee shall surrender the permit to the department on or before the effective date of the suspension or revocation.
A permit is not valid beyond the effective date of the suspension or revocation, whether surrendered or not.

History.

(§ 3 ch 27 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For suspension and revocation, see 15 AAC 160, art. 9.

Sec. 05.15.060.
Regulations.

The department shall adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) necessary to carry out this chapter covering, but not limited to,

the issuance, renewal, and revocation of permits, licenses, and vendor registrations;

a method of ascertaining net proceeds, the determination of items of expense that may be incurred or paid, and the limitation of the amount of the items of expense to prevent the proceeds from the activity permitted from being diverted to noncharitable, noneducational, nonreligious, or profit-making organizations, individuals, or groups;

the immediate revocation of permits, licenses, and vendor registrations authorized under this chapter if this chapter or regulations adopted under it are violated;

the requiring of detailed, sworn, financial reports of operations from permittees and licensees including detailed statements of receipts and payments;

the investigation of permittees, licensees, registered vendors, and their employees, including the fingerprinting of those permittees, licensees, registered vendors, and employees whom the department considers it advisable to fingerprint;

the method and manner of conducting authorized activities and awarding of prizes or awards, and the equipment that may be used;

the number of activities that may be held, operated, or conducted under a permit during a specified period; however, the department may not allow more than 14 bingo sessions a month and 35 bingo games a session to be conducted under a permit; the holders of a multiple-beneficiary permit under AS

05.15.100(d)

may hold, operate, or conduct the number of sessions and games a month equal to the number allowed an individual permittee per month multiplied by the number of holders of the multiple-beneficiary permit;

a method of accounting for receipts and disbursements by operators, including the keeping of records and requirements for the deposit of all receipts in a bank;

the disposition of funds in possession of a permittee, a person, municipality, or qualified organization that possesses an operator’s license, or a registered vendor at the time a permit, a license, or a vendor registration is surrendered, revoked, or invalidated;

restrictions on the participation by employees of the Department of Fish and Game in salmon classics, king salmon classics, and big bull moose derbies, and by employees of Douglas Island Pink and Chum in king salmon classics;

other matters the department considers necessary to carry out this chapter or protect the best interest of the public.

Regulations adopted by the department under this section relating to charitable gaming activity involving pull-tabs shall, to the extent permitted by this chapter, be consistent with the standards on pull-tabs of the North American Gaming Regulators Association, as amended from time to time.

History.

(§ 4 ch 27 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 94 SLA 1986; am § 5 ch 99 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 1991; am §§ 3, 4 ch 70 SLA 1993; am E.O. No. 82 § 4 (1993); am § 1 ch 22 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For permits and licenses, see 15 AAC 160, art. 1.

For operators, see 15 AAC 160, art. 2.

For vendors, see 15 AAC 160, art. 3.

For multiple-beneficiary permits and self-directed permits, see 15 AAC 160, art. 4.

For pull-tab games, see 15 AAC 160, art. 5.

For bingo, see 15 AAC 160, art. 6.

For raffles, lotteries, and other gaming activities, see 15 AAC 160, art. 7.

For accounting and recordkeeping, see 15 AAC 160, art. 8.

For suspension and revocation, see 15 AAC 160, art. 9.

For hearings, see 15 AAC 160, art. 10.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 15, 2014, in (a)(10), inserted “and big bull moose derbies,” following “king salmon classics,” and made a related change.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Under former AS 05.15.210 (now see AS

05.15.690

) a permit may be issued which gives a qualified organization the privilege of conducting any of the designated activities.
AS

05.15.040

limits the activities that may be conducted to those activities specified in the permit. Under AS

05.15.060

the commissioner [now department] has authority to further limit the number of activities which may be conducted pursuant to any permit.
Therefore, absent any regulation to the contrary, a permit could be issued for more than one activity to a qualified organization. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

Sec. 05.15.070.
Examination of books and records.

The department may examine or have examined the books and records of a permittee, an operator, a registered vendor, or a person licensed to manufacture or to distribute pull-tab games in the state. The department may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, records, and other documents.

History.

(§ 6 ch 27 SLA 1960; am § 6 ch 99 SLA 1988; am § 5 ch 70 SLA 1993; am E.O. No. 82 § 5 (1993))

Sec. 05.15.080.
Reports and fees required of municipalities and qualified organizations.

A municipality or a qualified organization issued a permit under this chapter shall file a report with the department by the 45th day following each calendar quarter in which the permittee had gross receipts of $50,000 or more from activities authorized under this chapter. The report must include the type of activity conducted, the date and location of the activity, the amount of gross receipts, the amount of authorized expenses, the value of prizes awarded, the amount of net proceeds, and other information the department may require. However, if the only activity conducted by a municipality or qualified organization during a calendar quarter is a raffle or lottery or a Calcutta pool, then the municipality or qualified organization is not required to file a report under this subsection until the raffle or lottery or a Calcutta pool is completed.

A municipality or a qualified organization issued a permit under this chapter shall file an annual report with the department by March 15 of the year following the year in which activities were conducted, accompanied by the payment of the additional fee, as may be required under AS

05.15.020(b)

. The report must list the types of activities conducted, and, for each activity, the total amount of gross receipts, the total amount of authorized expenses, the total value of prizes awarded, and the total amount of net proceeds.

A permittee that conducts a Calcutta pool shall file a report for each pool conducted on a form prescribed by the department that lists

the date of the pool and the event;

the amount of wagers;

the amount of prizes distributed to the winners of the pool;

the amount and nature of each expense;

the amount remaining after the payment of the prizes and expenses;

any other information that the department requests or requires.

History.

(§ 6 ch 27 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 182 SLA 1976; am § 7 ch 99 SLA 1988; am §§ 1, 2 ch 43 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For bingo, see 15 AAC 160, art. 6.

For raffles, lotteries, and other gaming activities, see 15 AAC 160, art. 7.

For accounting and recordkeeping, see 15 AAC 160, art. 8.

Sec. 05.15.083.
Reports to department by operators.

An operator shall file a report with the department by the last business day of the month following each calendar quarter in which an activity was conducted. The report must include, for each authorizing permittee on whose behalf an activity was conducted during the quarter, the date and location of each activity, the type of activity conducted, the amount of gross receipts, the amount of authorized expenses, the value of prizes awarded, the amount of net proceeds paid, and other information the department may require; a completed Internal Revenue Service Form 941; and a copy of the operator’s employer contributions and wage reports submitted to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development for the quarter. However, if the only activity conducted by an operator during the calendar quarter is a raffle or lottery, then the operator is not required to file a report under this subsection until the raffle or lottery is completed.

An operator shall file an annual report with the department no later than February 28 of the year following the year in which activities were conducted. The report must include, for each authorizing permittee on whose behalf an activity was conducted, the types of activities conducted, the total amount of gross receipts, the total amount of authorized expenses, the total value of prizes awarded, and the total amount of net proceeds paid to each authorizing permittee. The annual report must also include a completed Internal Revenue Service Form W-2 for each person employed by the operator during the preceding year.

History.

(§ 8 ch 99 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in subsection (a) in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Administrative Code. —

For operators, see 15 AAC 160, art. 2.

For bingo, see 15 AAC 160, art. 6.

For accounting and recordkeeping, see 15 AAC 160, art. 8.

Sec. 05.15.087.
Operator’s reports to permittee and payment of net proceeds.

An operator shall file a monthly report with each authorizing permittee for which the operator has conducted an activity during the preceding month. The report must include a daily summary of activity conducted under the permit issued to the authorizing permittee and an accounting of gross receipts, expenses, and net proceeds for the month. A check in the amount of the net proceeds due to the authorizing permittee for the month must accompany the report. The operator shall file the report by the 15th day after the end of the month covered by the report.

An operator shall file a quarterly report with each authorizing permittee for which the operator has conducted an activity during the preceding calendar quarter. The report must contain quarterly summaries and year-to-date totals of the information provided under (a) of this section. The operator shall file the report by the last day of the month following the end of the calendar quarter.

An operator shall file an annual report with each authorizing permittee for which the operator has conducted an activity during the preceding calendar year. The report must contain an annual summary of the information provided under (a) of this section. The operator shall file this report by February 28 of the year following the year in which the activities were conducted.

An operator shall provide original invoice documents and deposit slips upon the request of an authorizing permittee for whom the operator has conducted activities.

History.

(§ 8 ch 99 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For operators, see 15 AAC 160, art. 2.

Sec. 05.15.090.
Agency reports.

Before April 15 of each year, the department shall prepare a detailed report containing a summary of all reports required of permittees and operators. The attorney general and the commissioner of public safety shall, within 10 days after the convening of the legislature each year, jointly prepare a detailed report outlining the effect, if any, of the operation of this chapter on the legal and law enforcement activities of the state and notify the legislature that the report is available.

History.

(§ 9 ch 27 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 182 SLA 1976; am § 9 ch 99 SLA 1988; am E.O. No. 82 § 6 (1993); am § 2 ch 21 SLA 1995)

Sec. 05.15.095.
General provisions relating to the filing of applications and reports and payment of fees.

The applications and reports to the department required by this chapter shall be signed under penalty of unsworn falsification in the second degree by the following person, as applicable:

the member in charge for the qualified organization;

a person authorized to sign on behalf of the municipality;

the operator or the operator’s agent;

the licensed pull-tab distributor or the distributor’s agent; or

the licensed pull-tab manufacturer or the manufacturer’s agent.

A permittee or operator may not conduct an activity under this chapter during a period in which a report or fee is delinquent.

A delinquent fee bears interest at the rate set by AS

43.05.225

.

A permittee or licensee under this chapter shall pay a penalty of one percent of the unpaid balance, as determined by the department, of a fee due under this chapter for each 30-day period or part of a 30-day period that the fee is delinquent. The department may waive the penalty if the failure to pay the fee on time is due to a reasonable cause, as defined by regulation adopted by the department. The amount of the penalty may not exceed 25 percent of the unpaid fee.

History.

(§ 10 ch 99 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1988 the term “unsworn falsification” was substituted for “perjury” in the introductory language of (a) of this section to correct a manifest error in § 10, ch. 99, SLA 1988.

Administrative Code. —

For permits and licenses, see 15 AAC 160, art. 1.

Sec. 05.15.097.
Notice to the alcoholic beverage control board.

If, after notice and hearing, the department determines that a person has violated a provision of this chapter related to gambling and the person is a licensee or permittee under AS 04, the department shall provide notice of the violation to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board.

History.

(§ 59 ch 101 SLA 1995)